Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-148.01
Denial of compensation; false representation.

No compensation shall be allowed if, at the time of or in the course of entering into employment or at the time of receiving notice of the removal of conditions from a conditional offer of employment: (1) The employee knowingly and willfully made a false representation as to his or her physical or medical condition by acknowledging in writing that he or she is able to perform the essential functions of the job with or without reasonable accommodation based upon the employer's written job description; (2) the employer relied upon the false representation and the reliance was a substantial factor in the hiring; and (3) a causal connection existed between the false representation and the injury.

Laws 2015, LB480, § 1.